hw2/foma/el.lexc
!!! el.lexc (Modern Greek) !!!
!!!   Adriana R. Flórez    !!!
!!!     EMPTY LEXICON      !!!
!! -------------------------!!

!! - Supported parts of speech: noun, adjective, verb
!! - Supported genders: masculine, feminine, neuter
!! - Supported numbers: singular, plural
!! - Supported persons: first, second, third
!! - Supported cases: nominative, genitive, accusative, vocative
!! - Supported adj. modifiers: comparative, superlative
!! - Supported verb tenses: present, past aorist, past imperfect, imperative, participle, gerund
Multichar_Symbols 
+N +A +V 
+Masc +Fem +Neut 
+Sg +Plur 
+1P +2P +3P 
+Nom +Gen +Acc +Voc 
+Comp +Sup 
+Present +Aorist +Imperfect +Imperative +Part +Gerund

!! Root lexicon: noun, adjective, verb
LEXICON Root 
        Noun ;
        Adj ;
        Verb ;

!! ------------------------------------------------------------

!! Noun lexicon
!! Divided into sub-lexicons per gender
!! Each gender divided into sub-lexicons per inflectional class tag (ending)
LEXICON Noun
άνθρωπος:ανθρωπ NounMascOs ;
άντρας:αντρ NounMascAs ;
αφέντης:αφεντ NounMascIs ; 
ίδρυμα:ιδρυ NounNeutMa ;
ψάρι:ψάρι NounNeutI ;
χαμόγελο:χαμογελ NounNeutO ;
χώρα:χωρ NounFemA ; 
ύπαρξη:υπαρξ NounFemI ; 

!! Masculine
LEXICON NounMascOs
+Ν+Sg+Nom:^ος # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ου # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ο # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^ε # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^οι # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ους # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^οι # ;

LEXICON NounMascAs
+N+Sg+Nom:^ας # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;

LEXICON NounMascIs
+N+Sg+Nom:^ης # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^η # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;

!! Neuter
LEXICON NounNeutMa
+N+Sg+Nom:^μα # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ματος # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^μα # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^μα # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ματα # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^μάτων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ματα # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ματα # ;

LEXICON NounNeutI
+N+Sg+Nom:^ι # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ιου # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ι # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^ι # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ια # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ίων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ια # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ια # ;

LEXICON NounNeutO
+N+Sg+Nom:^ο # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ου # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^ο # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^ο # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^α # ;

!! Feminine
LEXICON NounFemA
+N+Sg+Nom:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^ας # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^α # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^α # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;

LEXICON NounFemI
+N+Sg+Nom:^η # ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^ης # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+N+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+N+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+N+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+N+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;



!! ------------------------------------------------------------

!! Adjective lexicon
!! Divided into sub-lexicons inflectional class tag (ending)
!! Each inflectional class tag divided into sub-lexicons per gender
LEXICON Adj
αγγλικός:αγγλικ AdjOs1;
άρρωστος:αρρωστ AdjOs2;
ακριβής:ακριβ AdjIs1;
ζηληαρις:ζηληαρ AdjIs2;
βαθύς:βαθ AdjUs;

LEXICON AdjOs1
+A+Masc: AdjMascOs1 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemOs1 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutOs1 ;

!! Os1 class has 2 possibilities per comparative
!! (Depending on whether the noun forms it regularly or exceptionally irregular)
LEXICON AdjMascOs1
+Sg+Nom:^ός # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ό # ;
+Sg+Voc:^έ # ;
+Plur+Nom:^οί # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ούς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^οί # ;
+Comp:^ότερος AdjMascOs2 ; !! Canonical form
+Comp:^ύτερος AdjMascOs2 ; !! Irregular
+Sup:^ότατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemOs1
+Sg+Nom:^ή # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ής # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ή # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ές # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ές # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ές # ;
+Comp1:^ότερη AdjFemOs2 ; !! Canonical form
+Comp2:^ήτερη AdjFemOs2 ; !! Irregular
+Sup:^ότατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutOs1
+Sg+Nom:^ό # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ό # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ό # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ά # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ά # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ά # ;
+Comp1:^ότερο AdjNeutOs2 ; !! Canonical form
+Comp2:^ύτερο AdjNeutOs2 ; !! Irregular
+Sup:^ότατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjOs2
+A+Masc: AdjMascOs2 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemOs2 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjMascOs2
+Sg+Nom:^ος # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ου # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ο # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ε # ;
+Plur+Nom:^οι # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ους # ;
+Plur+Voc:^οι # ;
+Comp:^ότερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^ότατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemOs2
+Sg+Nom:^η # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ης # ;
+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;
+Comp:^ότερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^ότατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutOs2
+Sg+Nom:^ό # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ό # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ό # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ά # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ά # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ά # ;
+Comp:^ότερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^ότατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjIs1
+A+Masc: AdjMascIs1 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemIs1 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutIs1 ;

LEXICON AdjMascIs1
+Sg+Nom:^ής # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ούς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ή # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Nom:^είς # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^είς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^είς # ;
+Comp:^έστερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^έστατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemIs1
+Sg+Nom:^ής # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ούς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ή # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Nom:^είς # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^είς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^είς # ;
+Comp:^έστερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^έστατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutIs1
+Sg+Nom:^ές # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ούς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ές # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ές # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ή # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ή # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ή # ;
+Comp:^έστερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^έστατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjIs2
+A+Masc: AdjMascIs2 ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemIs2 ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutIs2 ;

LEXICON AdjMascIs2
+Sg+Nom:^ης # ;
+Sg+Gen:^η # ;
+Sg+Acc:^η # ;
+Sg+Voc:^η # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ηδες # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ηδων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ηδες # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ηδες # ;
+Comp:^ηστερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^ηστατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemIs2
+Sg+Nom:^α # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ας # ;
+Sg+Acc:^α # ;
+Sg+Voc:^α # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ες # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ες # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ες # ;
+Comp:^ηστερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^ηστατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutIs2
+Sg+Nom:^ικο # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ικου # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ικο # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ικο # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ικα # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ικων # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ικα # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ικα # ;
+Comp:^ηστερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^ηστατο AdjNeutOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjUs
+A+Masc: AdjMascUs ;
+A+Fem: AdjFemUs ;
+A+Neut: AdjNeutUs ;

LEXICON AdjMascUs
+Sg+Nom:^ύς # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ιού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ύ # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ύ # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ιοί # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ιών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ιούς # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ιοί # ;
+Comp:^ύτερος AdjMascOs2 ;
+Sup:^ύτατος AdjMascOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjFemUs
+Sg+Nom:^ιά # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ιάς # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ιά # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ιά # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ιές # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ιών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ιές # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ιές # ;
+Comp:^ύτερη AdjFemOs2 ;
+Sup:^ύτατη AdjFemOs2 ;

LEXICON AdjNeutUs
+Sg+Nom:^ύ # ;
+Sg+Gen:^ιού # ;
+Sg+Acc:^ύ # ;
+Sg+Voc:^ύ # ;
+Plur+Nom:^ιά # ;
+Plur+Gen:^ιών # ;
+Plur+Acc:^ιά # ;
+Plur+Voc:^ιά # ;
+Comp:^ύτερο AdjNeutOs2 ;
+Sup:^ύτατο AdjFemOs2 ;


!! ------------------------------------------------------------
!! VERBS

!! Verb lexicon supports Α-conjugation, subgroup within A:
!! - Ending in νω in active
!! - Ending in ομαι in passive
LEXICON Verb
πληρώνω:πληρων VerbA ; !! 3 syllables
βελτιώνω:βελτιων VerbA ;
διαβάζω:διαβαζ VerbA ; !! 2 syllables
γράφω:γραφ VerbA ;
αισθάνομαι:αισθαν VerbPath1 ; !! passive with θ
λεγομαι:λεγ VerbPath1 ;          
αναλογίζομαι:αναλογιζ VerbPath2 ; !! pasive with τ
συνεργάζομαι:συνεργα VerbPath2 ;

!! Alpha conjugation (ending in -νω, past aor. in -σα)
LEXICON VerbA
+V+Infinitive:^ω # ;           
+V+Present+Sg+1P:^ω # ;           
+V+Present+Sg+2P:^εις # ;
+V+Present+Sg+3P:^ει # ;
+V+Present+Plur+1P:^ουμε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+2P:^ετε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+3P:^ουν # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+1P:^^α # ;       
+V+Aorist+Sg+2P:^^ες # ;      
+V+Aorist+Sg+3P:^^ε # ;       
+V+Aorist+Plur+1P:^^αμε # ;    
+V+Aorist+Plur+2P:^^ατε # ;   
+V+Aorist+Plur+3P:^^αν # ;     
+V+Imperfect+Sg+1P:^α # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+2P:^ες # ; 
+V+Imperfect+Sg+3P:^ε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+1P:^αμε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+2P:^ατε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+3P:^αν # ;
+V+Imperative+Sg:^ε # ;         
+V+Imperative+Plur:^τε # ;
+V+Gerund:^οντας # ;
+V+Part:^ει #;

!! Passive conjugation (past aor. in -θηκα)
LEXICON VerbPath1
+V+Infinitive:^ομαι
+V+Present+Sg+1P:^ομαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+2P:^ασαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+3P:^αται # ;
+V+Present+Plur+1P:^αμαστε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+2P:^αστε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+3P:^ωνται # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+1P:^θηκα # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+2P:^θηκες # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+3P:^θηκε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+1P:^θηκαμε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+2P:^θηκατε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+3P:^θηκαν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+1P:^όμουν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+2P:^όσουν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+3P:^όταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+1P:^όμασταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+2P:^όσασταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+3P:^όνταν # ;
+V+Imperative+Sg:^σου # ;
+V+Imperative+Plur:^αστείτε # ;
+V+Part:^ηθεί # ;

!! Passive conjugation (στηκα)
LEXICON VerbPath2
+V+Infinitive:^ομαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+1P:^ομαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+2P:^εσαι # ;
+V+Present+Sg+3P:^εται # ;
+V+Present+Plur+1P:^ομαστε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+2P:^εστε # ;
+V+Present+Plur+3P:^ονται # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+1P:^στηκα # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+2P:^στηκες # ;
+V+Aorist+Sg+3P:^στηκε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+1P:^στηκαμε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+2P:^στηκατε # ;
+V+Aorist+Plur+3P:^στήκαν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+1P:^όμουν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+2P:^όσουν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Sg+3P:^όταν # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+1P:^όμαστε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+2P:^όσαστε # ;
+V+Imperfect+Plur+3P:^ονταν # ;
+V+Imperative+Sg:^σου # ;
+V+Imperative+Plur:^στείτε # ;
+V+Part:^στεί # ;
